Utah statutes.
76-7-329.    Person unauthorized to perform abortions -- Penalties.
A person who is not legally authorized by the state to perform abortions, but
who nevertheless directly performs a partial birth abortion, is subject to
Sections 76-7-301, 76-7-314, 76-7-326, and 76-7-327.
